District of Columbia statutes.
48-841.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“FDA” means the federal Food and Drug Administration.

(2)

“Off-label use” means the use of a prescription drug for human use to treat a condition that is not included in the labeling for that medication, as approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration.

(3)

“Prescriber” means a person who is licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized by the District to prescribe and administer prescription drugs for human use in the course of a professional practice.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 202, 55 DCR 1659
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 309(b), 56 DCR 1117

History

D.C. Law 17-353, in par. (2), substituted “prescription drug for human use” for “prescription drug”; in par. (3), substituted “prescription drugs for human use” for “prescription drugs”.

Effect of Amendments